sl-SI: Način predelave penastih bonbonov: S čokoladnim prelivom; S kokosovim posipom; Dehidrirano; Liofilizirano; Navadno; Opečeno; Drugo
ro-RO: Metoda de procesare a bezelei: Îmbrăcat în ciocolată; Îmbrăcat în nucă de cocos; Deshidratat; Liofilizat; Normal; Prăjit; Altele
ru: Метод обработки маршмеллоу: В шоколадной глазури; В кокосовой стружке; Дегидрированный; Сублимированный; Обычный; Жареный; Другое
ja: マシュマロ加工方法: チョコレートコーティング; ココナッツコーティング; 乾燥; フリーズドライ; レギュラー; 焼き; その他
es: Método de procesamiento del malvavisco: Cubierto de chocolate; Cubierto de coco; Deshidratado; Liofilizado; Regular; Tostado; Otro
sv: Marshmallow-bearbetningsmetod: Chokladöverdragen; Kokosöverdragen; Torkad; Frystorkad; Vanlig; Rostad; Annat
nl: Marshmallow verwerkingsmethode: Omhuld met chocolade; Omhuld met kokos; Gedehydrateerd; Gevriesdroogd; Normaal; Geroosterd; Overige
zh-TW: 棉花糖加工方式: 巧克力塗層; 椰絲塗層; 脫水; 凍乾; 一般; 烘烤; 其他
fi: Vaahtokarkkien käsittelymenetelmä: Suklaakuorrutettu; Kookoskuorrutettu; Kuivattu; Pakastekuivattu; Tavallinen; Paahdettu; Muu
nb: Marshmallow-behandlingsmetode: Sjokoladetrukket; Kokostrukket; Dehydrert; Frysetørket; Vanlig; Ristet; Annet
el: Μέθοδος επεξεργασίας Marshmallow: Επικάλυψη σοκολάτας; Επικάλυψη καρύδας; Αφυδατωμένο; Λυοφιλοποιημένο; Κανονικό; Φρυγανισμένο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Método de processamento de marshmallows: Coberto com chocolate; Coberto com coco; Desidratado; Liofilizado; Normal; Tostado; Outro
en: Marshmallow processing method: Chocolate coated; Coconut coated; Dehydrated; Freeze-dried; Regular; Toasted; Other
da: Forarbejdningsmetode for skumfiduser: Med chokoladeovertræk; Med kokosovertræk; Dehydreret; Frysetørret; Almindelig; Ristet; Andet
zh-CN: 棉花糖加工方法: 巧克力涂层; 椰蓉涂层; 脱水; 冻干; 常规; 烤制; 其他
lt-LT: Zefyrų apdorojimo metodas: Aplietas šokoladu; Apibarstytas kokosais; Dehidratuotas; Liofilizuotas; Įprastas; Skrudintas; Kita
pt-BR: Marshmallow processamento método: Com cobertura de chocolate; Com cobertura de coco; Desidratado; Liofilizado; Comum; Tostado; Outro
hr-HR: Metoda obrade sljeza: Obloženo čokoladom; Obloženo kokosom; Dehidrirano; Liofilizirano; Obično; Tostirano; Ostalo
fr: Procédé de transformation des guimauves: Enrobé de chocolat; Enrobé de noix de coco; Déshydraté; Lyophilisé; Classique; Grillé; Autre
de: Verarbeitungsmethode der Marshmallows: Mit Schokoladenüberzug; Mit Kokosnussüberzug; Dehydriert; Gefriergetrocknet; Normal; Geröstet; Sonstiges
vi: Phương pháp chế biến kẹo dẻo: Phủ sô-cô-la; Phủ dừa; Khử nước; Sấy thăng hoa; Thường; Nướng; Khác
pl: Metoda przetwarzania pianek marshmallow: W polewie czekoladowej; W posypce kokosowej; Suszone; Liofilizowane; Zwykłe; Opiekane; Inne
bg-BG: Метод за обработка на маршмелоу: С шоколадово покритие; С кокосово покритие; Дехидратирани; Лиофилизирани; Обикновени; Препечени; Друго
sk-SK: Metóda spracovania pochúťky marshmallow: Obalené v čokoláde; Obalené v kokose; Dehydrované; Lyofilizované; Bežné; Opekané; Iné
th: วิธีการแปรรูปมาร์ชเมลโลว์: เคลือบช็อกโกแลต; คลุกมะพร้าว; อบแห้ง; ฟรีซดราย; ธรรมดา; ปิ้ง; อื่นๆ
hu: Mályvacukor feldolgozási módja: Csokoládéval bevont; Kókusszal bevont; Dehidratált; Liofilizált; Normál; Pirított; Egyéb
cs: Metoda zpracování marshmallow: Potažené čokoládou; Obalené v kokosu; Dehydrované; Lyofilizované; Standardní; Opečené; Jiné
tr: Marshmallow işleme yöntemi: Çikolata kaplamalı; Hindistan cevizi kaplamalı; Suyu alınmış; Dondurularak kurutulmuş; Normal; Kızartılmış; Diğer
ko: 마시멜로 가공 방식: 초콜릿 코팅; 코코넛 코팅; 건조; 동결 건조; 일반; 구운; 기타
it: Metodo di lavorazione del marshmallow: Ricoperto di cioccolato; Ricoperto di cocco; Disidratato; Liofilizzato; Normale; Tostato; Altro